Utah statutes.
10-3-205.   Election of officers in municipalities operating under a city council form of government.

In each municipality operating under a five-member or six-member city council form of government, the election and terms of office shall be as follows:

(1)  The offices of mayor and approximately half the council members shall be filled in municipal elections held in 1977.  The terms shall be for four years.  These offices shall be filled every four years in municipal elections.

(2)  The offices of the remaining council members shall be filled in a municipal election held in 1979.  The terms shall be for four years.  These offices shall be filled every four years in municipal elections.

